Nevada, session 83, AB481.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 493 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Sustainable Aviation Fuel Incentive Fund is
hereby created in the State Treasury as a special revenue fund.
2. The Sustainable Aviation Fuel Incentive Fund is a
continuing fund without reversion. The interest and income
earned on the money in the Fund must, after deducting any
-
*AB481_R1*

– 2 –
applicable charges, be credited to the Fund. All claims against the
Fund must be paid as other claims against the State are paid.
3. The State Treasurer shall administer the Fund. The money
in the Fund must be used by the State Treasurer to carry out the
Sustainable Aviation Fuel Incentive Program created pursuant to
section 3 of this act.
4. The State Treasurer may apply for and accept gifts, grants,
donations, bequests and any other source of money available
under federal law and from private sources for deposit in the
Fund to carry out the provisions of the Sustainable Aviation Fuel
Incentive Program created by section 3 of this act.
Sec. 3. 1. The Sustainable Aviation Fuel Incentive
Program is hereby created for the purpose of providing incentives
of money for the purchase of sustainable aviation fuel produced in
this State.
2. A domestic air carrier based in the United States is eligible
to receive from the Program for the purchase of sustainable
aviation fuel produced in this State an incentive of $2.50 per
gallon.
3. A carrier that qualifies for an incentive from the Program
pursuant to subsection 2 may obtain an incentive by submitting a
claim to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall review any
claim submitted pursuant to this subsection to confirm that the air
carrier qualifies for an incentive from the Program.
4. The State Treasurer may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Air carrier” means a person who provides commercial air
transportation to passengers.
(b) “Sustainable aviation fuel” means liquid fuel that meets
the criteria set forth in subsections (d) and (e) of 26 U.S.C. § 40B.
Sec. 4. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Incentive Fund created by
section 2 of this act the sum of $10,000,000 to award incentives
from the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Incentive Program created by
section 3 of this act.
Sec. 5. 1. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
(a) Section 9 of Article 8 of the Nevada Constitution contains a
provision commonly known as a “gift clause” which restricts the
State under certain circumstances from donating or loaning the
State’s money or credit to any company, association or corporation,
except corporations formed for educational or charitable purposes.
(b) In Employers Insurance Company of Nevada v. State Board
of Examiners, 117 Nev. 249, 258 (2001), the Nevada Supreme Court
held that the State loans its credit in violation of Section 9 of Article
-
*AB481_R1*

– 3 –
8 of the Nevada Constitution only when “the State acts as a surety or
guarantor for the debts of a company, corporation or association.”
(c) In Lawrence v. Clark County, 127 Nev. 390, 399 (2011), the
Nevada Supreme Court held that the State does not donate, loan or
“gift” its money in violation of Section 9 of Article 8 of the Nevada
Constitution when the State dispenses state funds for a public
purpose and the State receives a valuable benefit or fair
consideration in exchange for the dispensation of the state funds.
(d) In State ex rel. Brennan v. Bowman, 89 Nev. 330, 333
(1973), the Nevada Supreme Court held that legislation which
promotes economic development and seeks to create, protect or
enhance job opportunities “inures to the public benefit” and serves
important public purposes because it assists in “relieving
unemployment and maintaining a stable economy.”
(e) In Lawrence v. Clark County, 127 Nev. 390, 399, 406
(2011), the Nevada Supreme Court adopted the public trust doctrine
in this State, noting that the public possesses inviolable rights to the
natural resources of the State and the State must serve as trustee of
the public resources and finding that the “constitutional policy
contained in the gift clause infers the people’s intent to constrain the
Legislature’s ability to alienate public trust lands as well as public
funds.”
(f) Section 3 of Article 9 of the Nevada Constitution restricts the
ability of the State to contract public debts, but makes an exception
for “any and all contracts necessary, expedient or advisable for the
protection and preservation of any of its property or natural
resources, or for the purposes of obtaining the benefits thereof,”
which further emphasizes the constitutionally mandated importance
of the protection and preservation of the natural resources of this
State.
(g) In McLaughlin v. Housing Authority of the City of Las
Vegas, 68 Nev. 84, 93 (1951) and Lawrence v. Clark County, 127
Nev. 390, 399 (2011), the Nevada Supreme Court held that when
the Legislature authorizes a state agency to dispense state funds, the
courts will:
(1) Carefully examine whether the Legislature made an
informed and appropriate finding that the dispensation of the state
funds serves a public purpose and the State receives a valuable
benefit or fair consideration in exchange for the dispensation;
(2) Give great weight and due deference to the Legislature’s
finding, and the courts will uphold the Legislature’s “finding unless
it clearly appears to be erroneous and without reasonable
foundation;” and
(3) Closely examine whether the dispensing state agency
reviews all facts, figures and necessary information when making
-
*AB481_R1*

– 4 –
the dispensation, and when the state agency has done so, it will not
be second-guessed by the courts.
2. The Legislature hereby further finds and declares that:
(a) The release of greenhouse gases traps heat in the Earth’s
atmosphere, driving climate change.
(b) The United States Environmental Protection Agency has
concluded that certain large subsonic jet aircraft and subsonic
propeller driven airplanes that are used in all domestic and
international flights originating in the United States are responsible
for 10 percent of all greenhouse gas emissions from the
transportation sector in the United States and 3 percent of all
greenhouse gas emissions in the United States.
(c) According to the Federal Aviation Administration, about 10
percent of all aircraft emissions occur close to the surface of the
Earth near ground level and most particulate matter that affects
communities surrounding an airport are the result of emissions
released during landing and takeoff.
(d) Climate change threatens the health, lives and safety of
Nevada’s residents, as well as Nevada’s diverse ecosystems,
wildlands and wildlife. Rising temperatures have increased the
severity and length of droughts and the frequency and intensity of
wildfires.
(e) Climate change threatens Nevada’s economy. Rising
temperatures, compounded by the urban heat island effect, will
likely make summers in Southern Nevada dangerously hot,
potentially deterring visitors and reducing the hours when it is safe
to engage in outdoor activities, such as construction.
(f) Throughout this State, rising temperatures will impact public
health by increasing heat stress on vulnerable populations and
increasing air pollution from more frequent wildfires.
(g) The State of Nevada and its residents will benefit from the
diversification and economic growth driven by a transition to a low-
carbon emission aviation transportation sector.
3. The Legislature lastly finds and declares that:
(a) The state program developed and carried into effect pursuant
to this act will not result in the State acting as a surety or guarantor
of the debts of an air carrier receiving an incentive of money.
(b) The purpose of this act is to develop and carry into effect a
state program to encourage the production and purchase of
sustainable aviation fuel in this State for the purposes of:
(1) Developing the market and industry for sustainable
aviation fuel in this State and promoting jobs and businesses in this
State in the sustainable aviation fuel industry; and
-
*AB481_R1*

– 5 –
(2) Reducing greenhouse gases emitted by domestic air
carriers that operate in this State, specifically emissions occurring
on takeoff and landing at airports in this State.
(c) The promotion and development of the sustainable fuel
industry in this State is an important public purpose which
incentivizes the development of business and industry in this State.
(d) The protection and preservation of the natural resources of
this State by incentivizing the purchase of sustainable aviation fuel
is an important public purpose which will limit the emissions of
greenhouse gasses from air carriers operating in this State and thus
lower the contributions air travel in this State make to climate
change, which threatens the health, safety and welfare of the
residents of this State and the economy of this State.
(e) The provisions of this act are intended to serve an important
public purpose and ensure that the State receives valuable benefits
and fair consideration in exchange for each incentive of money from
the program because:
(1) The program requires the dispensing agency to review all
facts, figures and necessary information when making each
incentive of money from the program to ensure the incentive meets
the requirements of the program;
(2) The promotion and development of the sustainable fuel
industry in this State and the protection and preservation of the
natural resources of this State are important public purposes that
promote job growth in this State and protect the health, safety and
welfare of the residents of this State; and
(3) The dispensing state agency may not make an incentive
of money from the program unless the air carrier purchases
sustainable aviation fuel in accordance with the requirements of the
program.
H
-
*AB481_R1*